Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 6

Opiod Abuse or Diversion

63-1-601. Reporting suspected opiod abuse or diversion.

The department of health shall accept allegations of opioid abuse or diversion. The department shall publicize a means of reporting allegations of opioid abuse or diversion.

Any entity that prescribes, dispenses, or handles opioids shall provide information to employees about reporting suspected opioid abuse or diversion. The information may be provided to each employee individually in writing, documented by the employing entity, or by posting, in a conspicuous location in a non-public area regularly used by employees, a sign at least eleven inches (11") in height and seventeen inches (17") in width stating:

NOTICE: PLEASE REPORT ANY SUSPECTED ABUSE OR DIVERSION OF OPIOIDS, OR ANY OTHER IMPROPER BEHAVIOR WITH RESPECT TO OPIOIDS, TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH'S COMPLAINT INTAKE LINE:

[NUMBER OF INTAKE LINE]

The department shall refer reports received to the appropriate health-related board or law enforcement official.

Acts 2018, ch. 675, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 675, § 2. January 1, 2019.

63-1-602. Protection of employees or persons who report information relative to opiod abuse or diversion.

No employee of an entity that prescribes, dispenses, or handles opioids shall be discharged or terminated solely for reporting information in good faith to the department of health.

No person licensed under this title shall suffer an adverse licensure action solely for reporting information in good faith to the department of health.

A person who reports information in good faith to the department of health is immune from civil liability related to the report.

Acts 2018, ch. 675, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 675, § 2. January 1, 2019.